Montana, session 2025, HB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5-11-222, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-11-222. Reports to legislature. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (5), a report
to the legislature means a biennial report required by the legislature and filed in accordance with 5-11-210 on or
before September 1 of each year preceding the convening of a regular session of the legislature.
(b) If otherwise specified in law, a report may be required more or less frequently than the biennial
requirement in subsection (1)(a).
(2) Reports to the legislature include:
(a) annual reports on the unified investment program for public funds and public retirement
systems and state compensation insurance fund assets audits from the board of investments in accordance
with Article VIII, section 13, of the Montana constitution;
(b) federal mandates requirements from the governor in accordance with 2-1-407;
(c) activities of the state records committee in accordance with 2-6-1108;
(d) revenue studies from the director of revenue, if requested, in accordance with 2-7-104;
(e) legislative audit reports from the legislative audit division in accordance with 2-8-112 and 23-7-
410;
(f) the annual performance report of each department to the appropriate interim budget committee
and legislative policy interim committee in accordance with 2-12-105;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(g) progress on gender and racial balance from the governor in accordance with 2-15-108;
(h) a mental health report from the ombudsman in accordance with 2-15-210;
(i) policies related to children and families from the interagency coordinating council for state
prevention in accordance with 2-15-225;
(j) watercourse name changes, if any, from the secretary of state in accordance with 2-15-401;
(k) results of programs established in 2-15-3111 through 2-15-3113 from the livestock loss board
in accordance with 2-15-3113;
(l) the allocation of space report from the department of administration required in accordance
with 2-17-101;
(m) information technology activities in accordance with 2-17-512;
(n) state strategic information technology plan exceptions, if granted, from the department of
administration in accordance with 2-17-515;
(o) the state strategic information technology plan and biennial report from the department of
administration in accordance with 2-17-521 and 2-17-522;
(p) reports from standing, interim, and administrative committees, if prepared, in accordance with
2-17-825 and 5-5-216;
(q) statistical and other data related to business transacted by the courts from the court
administrator, if requested, in accordance with 3-1-702;
(r) the judicial standards commission report in accordance with 3-1-1126;
(s) an annual report on the actual cost of legislation that had a projected fiscal impact from the
office of budget and program planning in accordance with 5-4-208;
(t) a link to annual state agency reports on grants awarded in the previous fiscal year established
by the legislative finance committee in accordance with 5-12-208;
(u) reports prepared by the legislative fiscal analyst, and as determined by the analyst, in
accordance with 5-12-302(4);
(v) a report, if necessary, on administrative policies or rules adopted under 5-11-105 that may
impair the independence of the legislative audit division in accordance with 5-13-305;
(w) if a waste of state resources occurs, a report from the legislative state auditor, in accordance
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
with 5-13-311;
(x) school funding commission reports each fifth interim in accordance with 5-20-301;
(y) a report of political committee operations conducted on state-owned property, if required, from
a political committee to the legislative services division in accordance with 13-37-404;
(z) a report concerning taxable value from the department of revenue in accordance with 15-1-
205;
(aa) a report on tax credits from the revenue interim committee in accordance with 15-30-2303;
(bb) semiannual reports on the Montana heritage preservation and development account from the
Montana heritage preservation and development commission in accordance with 15-65-121;
(cc) general marijuana regulation reports and medical marijuana registry reports from the
department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-110;
(dd) annual reports on general fund and nongeneral fund encumbrances from the department of
administration in accordance with 17-1-102;
(ee) loans or loan extensions authorized for two consecutive fiscal years from the department of
administration and office of commissioner of higher education, including negative cash balances from the
commissioner of higher education, in accordance with 17-2-107;
(ff) a report of local government entities that have balances contrary to limitations provided for in
17-2-302 or that failed to reduce the charge from the department of administration in accordance with 17-2-304;
(gg) an annual report from the board of investments in accordance with 17-5-1650(2);
(hh) a quarterly report from the office of budget and program planning to the legislative finance
committee identifying the amount and the type of debt payoff or other expenditure from the debt and liability
free account in accordance with 17-6-214;
(ii) a report on retirement system trust investments and benefits from the board of investments in
accordance with 17-6-230;
(jj) recommendations for reductions in spending and related analysis, if required, from the office of
budget and program planning in accordance with 17-7-140;
(kk) a statewide facility inventory and condition assessment from the department of administration
in accordance with 17-7-202;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(ll) actuary reports and investigations for public retirement systems from the public employees'
retirement board in accordance with 19-2-405;
(mm) a work report from the public employees' retirement board in accordance with 19-2-407;
(nn) annual actuarial reports and evaluations from the teachers' retirement board in accordance with
19-20-201;
(oo) reports from the state director of K-12 career and vocational and technical education, as
requested, in accordance with 20-7-308;
(pp) 5-year state plan for career and technical education reports from the board of regents in
accordance with 20-7-330;
(qq) a gifted and talented students report from the office of public instruction in accordance with 20-
7-904;
(rr) status changes for at-risk students from the office of public instruction in accordance with 20-9-
328;
(ss) status changes for American Indian students from the office of public instruction in accordance
with 20-9-330;
(tt) reports regarding the Montana Indian language preservation program from the office of public
instruction in accordance with 20-9-537;
(uu) proposals for funding community colleges from the board of regents in accordance with 20-15-
309;
(vv) expenditures and activities of the Montana agricultural experiment station and extension
service, as requested, in accordance with 20-25-236;
(ww) reports, if requested by the legislature, from the president of each of the units of the higher
education system in accordance with 20-25-305;
(xx) reports, if prepared by a public postsecondary institution, regarding free expression activities on
campus in accordance with 20-25-1506;
(yy) reports from the Montana historical society trustees in accordance with 22-3-107;
(zz) state lottery reports in accordance with 23-7-202;
(aaa) state fund reports, if required, from the commissioner in accordance with 33-1-115;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(bbb) reports from the department of labor and industry in accordance with 39-6-101;
(ccc) victim unemployment benefits reports from the department of labor and industry in accordance
with 39-51-2111;
(ddd) state fund business reports in accordance with 39-71-2363;
(eee) risk-based capital reports, if required, from the state fund in accordance with 39-71-2375;
(fff) child custody reports from the office of the court administrator in accordance with 41-3-1004;
(ggg) reports of remission of fine or forfeiture, respite, commutation, or pardon granted from the
governor in accordance with 46-23-316;
(hhh) annual statewide public defender reports from the office of state public defender in accordance
with 47-1-125;
(iii) a trauma care system report from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 50-6-402;
(jjj) an annual report on chemical abortion data from the department of public health and human
services in accordance with 50-20-709;
(kkk) Montana criminal justice oversight council reports in accordance with 53-1-216;
(lll) medicaid block grant reports from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-1-611;
(mmm) reports on the approval and implementation status of medicaid section 1115 waivers in
accordance with 53-2-215;
(nnn) provider rate, medicaid waiver, or medicaid state plan change reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-101;
(ooo) medicaid funding reports from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-6-110;
(ppp) proposals regarding managed care for medicaid recipients, if required, from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-116;
(qqq) reports on toxicology and prescription drug registry information from the suicide prevention
officer in accordance with 53-21-1101;
(rrr) suicide reduction plans from the department of public health and human services in
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
accordance with 53-21-1102;
(sss) annual compliance reports from certifying organizations to the criminal justice oversight council
in accordance with 53-24-311;
(ttt) a compliance and inspection report from the department of corrections in accordance with 53-
30-604;
(uuu) emergency medical services grants from the department of transportation in accordance with
61-2-109;
(vvv) annual financial reports on the environmental contingency account from the department of
environmental quality in accordance with 75-1-1101;
(www) a report from the land board, if prepared, in accordance with 76-12-109;
(xxx) an annual state trust land report from the land board in accordance with 77-1-223;
(yyy) a noxious plant report, if prepared, from the department of agriculture in accordance with 80-7-
713;
(zzz) state water plans from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance
with 85-1-203;
(aaaa) reports on the allocation of renewable resources grants and loans for emergencies, if required,
from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance with 85-1-605;
(bbbb) water storage projects from the governor's office in accordance with 85-1-704;
(cccc) upper Clark Fork River basin steering committee reports, if prepared, in accordance with 85-2-
338;
(dddd) upland game bird enhancement program reports in accordance with 87-1-250;
(eeee) private land/public wildlife advisory committee reports in accordance with 87-1-269;
(ffff) a future fisheries improvement program report from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-272;
(gggg) license revenue recommendations from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-629;
(hhhh) reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks on conservation licenses sold and
revenue received in accordance with 87-2-201;
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(iiii) hydrocarbon and geology investigation reports from the bureau of mines and geology in
accordance with 90-2-201;
(jjjj) coal ash markets investigation reports from the department of commerce in accordance with
90-2-202;
(kkkk) an annual report from the pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council in
accordance with 90-4-403;
(llll) community property-assessed capital enhancements program reports from the Montana facility
finance authority in accordance with 90-4-1303;
(mmmm) veterans' home loan mortgage loan reports from the board of housing in accordance
with 90-6-604;
(nnnn) matching infrastructure planning grant awards by the department of commerce in accordance
with 90-6-703(3); and
(oooo) Montana coal endowment program reports from the department of commerce in accordance
with 90-6-710.
(3) Reports to the legislature include reports made to an interim committee as follows:
(a) reports to the law and justice interim committee, including:
(i) a report on fentanyl-related mandatory minimums from the attorney general in accordance with
2-15-505;
(ii) findings of the domestic violence fatality review commission in accordance with 2-15-2017;
(iii) the report from the missing indigenous persons review commission in accordance with 2-15-
2018;
(iv) reports from the department of justice and public safety officer standards and training council in
accordance with 2-15-2029;
(v) reports on district court judge caseload and substitutions from the office of court administrator
in accordance with 3-1-713;
(vi) information on the Montana False Claims Act from the department of justice in accordance with
17-8-416;
(vii) annual case status reports from the attorney general in accordance with 41-3-210;
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(viii) an annual report from the department of public health and human services on the number of
referrals to county attorneys pursuant to 41-3-202(1)(b)(i) in accordance with 41-3-211;
(ix) office of court administrator reports in accordance with 41-5-2003;
(x) reports on pending investigations from the public safety officer standards and training council in
accordance with 44-4-408;
(xi) statewide public safety communications system activities from the department of justice in
accordance with 44-4-1606;
(xii) the annual report on the activities of the sexual assault response network program and the
sexual assault response team committee from the department of justice in accordance with 44-4-1705;
(xiii) reports on the status of the crisis intervention team training program from the board of crime
control in accordance with 44-7-110;
(xiv) restorative justice grant program status and performance from the board of crime control in
accordance with 44-7-302;
(xv) law enforcement agency facial recognition technology use reports from the department of
justice in accordance with 44-15-111(3);
(xvi) reports on third-party vendors providing facial recognition services to state agencies reports in
accordance with 44-15-111(4)(b);
(xvii) reports on offenders under supervision with new offenses or violations from the department of
corrections in accordance with 46-23-1016;
(xviii) supervision responses grid reports from the department of corrections in accordance with 46-
23-1028;
(xix) statewide public defender reports and information from the office of state public defender in
accordance with 47-1-125;
(xx) every 5 years, a percentage change in public defender funding report from the legislative fiscal
analyst in accordance with 47-1-125;
(xxi) every 5 years, statewide public defender reports on the percentage change in funding from the
office of state public defender in accordance with 47-1-125; and
(xxii) a report from the quality assurance unit from the department of corrections in accordance with
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
53-1-211;
(b) reports to the state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee, including:
(i) a report that includes information technology activities and additional information from the
information technology board in accordance with 2-17-512 and 2-17-513;
(ii) a report from the capitol complex advisory council in accordance with 2-17-804;
(iii) a report on the employee incentive award program from the department of administration in
accordance with 2-18-1103;
(iv) a board of veterans' affairs report in accordance with 10-2-102;
(v) a report on the decennial veterans' long-term care needs study from the department of public
health and human services and the Montana veterans' affairs division in accordance with 10-2-903;
(vi) a report on grants to the Montana civil air patrol from the department of military affairs in
accordance with 10-3-802;
(vii) annual reports on statewide election security from the secretary of state in accordance with 13-
1-205;
(viii) reports on money received in the special account for implementing the Help America Vote Act
from the secretary of state in accordance with 13-1-209;
(ix) a report regarding the youth voting program, if requested, from the secretary of state in
accordance with 13-22-108;
(x) a report from the commissioner of political practices in accordance with 13-37-120;
(xi) a report on retirement system trust investments from the board of investments in accordance
with 17-6-230;
(xii) actuarial valuations and other reports from the public employees' retirement board in
accordance with 19-2-405 and 19-3-117;
(xiii) actuarial valuations and other reports from the teachers' retirement board in accordance with
19-20-201 and 19-20-216;
(xiv) a report on the reemployment of retired members of the teachers' retirement system from the
teachers' retirement board in accordance with 19-20-732; and
(xv) changes, if any, affecting filing-office rules under the Uniform Commercial Code from the
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
secretary of state in accordance with 30-9A-527;
(c) reports to the children, families, health, and human services interim committee, including:
(i) a report from the department of public health and human services on the programs, grants, and
services funded under the healing and ending addiction through recovery and treatment account in 16-12-122;
(ii) Montana foster youth higher education assistance program grant reports from the
commissioner of higher education in accordance with 20-26-633;
(iii) prescription drug registry reports from the board of pharmacy in accordance with 37-7-1514;
(iv) Montana HELP Act workforce development reports from the department of public health and
human services in accordance with 39-12-103;
(v) reports from the department of public health and human services on the department's efforts
regarding the volunteer program to support child protective services activities in accordance with 41-3-132;
(vi) annual reports from the child and family ombudsman in accordance with 41-3-1211;
(vii) reports on activities and recommendations on child protective services activities, if required,
from the child and family ombudsman in accordance with 41-3-1215;
(viii) reports on the out-of-state placement of high-risk children with multiagency service needs from
the department of public health and human services in accordance with 52-2-311;
(ix) private alternative adolescent residential and outdoor programs reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 52-2-803;
(x) provider rate, medicaid waiver, or medicaid state plan change reports from the department of
public health and human services in accordance with 53-6-101;
(xi) a report from the department of public health and human services on home and community-
based services provider information in 53-6-406;
(xii) a report concerning mental health managed care services, if managed care is in place, from the
advisory council in accordance with 53-6-710;
(xiii) quarterly medicaid reports related to expansion from the department of public health and
human services in accordance with 53-6-1325;
(xiv) annual Montana developmental center reports from the department of public health and human
services in accordance with 53-20-225; and
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(xv) annual children's mental health outcomes from the department of public health and human
services in accordance with 53-21-508;
(xvi) suicide reduction plans from the department of public health and human services in
accordance with 53-21-1102;
(d) reports to the economic affairs interim committee, including:
(i) the annual state compensation insurance fund budget from the board of directors in
accordance with 5-5-223 and 39-71-2363;
(ii) medical marijuana registry reports from the department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-
110;
(iii) general marijuana regulation reports from the department of revenue in accordance with 16-12-
110(3);
(iv) annual reports on complaints against physicians certifying medical marijuana use from the
board of medical examiners in accordance with 16-12-110(6);
(v) an annual report on the administrative rate required from the department of commerce from the
Montana heritage preservation and development commission in accordance with 22-3-1002;
(vi) biennial reports from the department of labor and industry on weighing device license fees and
cost increases in accordance with 30-12-203;
(vii) state fund reports from the insurance commissioner, if required, in accordance with 33-1-115;
(viii) risk-based capital reports, if required, from the state fund in accordance with 33-1-115 and 39-
71-2375;
(ix) annual reinsurance reports from the Montana reinsurance association board required in
accordance with 33-22-1308;
(x) reports from the department of labor and industry concerning board attendance in accordance
with 37-1-107;
(xi) annual reports on physician complaints related to medical marijuana from the board of medical
examiners in accordance with 37-3-203;
(xii) prescription drug registry reports from the board of pharmacy in accordance with 37-7-1514;
(xiii) status reports on the special revenue account and fees charged as a funding source from the
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
board of funeral service in accordance with 37-19-204;
(xiv) unemployment insurance program integrity act reports from the department of labor and
industry in accordance with 39-51-706;
(xv) law enforcement agency facial recognition technology use reports from the department of
justice in accordance with 44-15-111(3);
(xvi) reports on third-party vendors providing facial recognition services to state agencies reports in
accordance with 44-15-111(4)(b);
(xvii) status reports on the distressed wood products industry revolving loan program from the
department of commerce in accordance with 90-1-503;
(e) reports to the education interim committee, including:
(i) reemployment of retired teachers, specialists, and administrators reports from the retirement
board in accordance with 19-20-732;
(ii) a report on participation in the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children in accordance with 20-1-231;
(iii) grow your own grant program reports from the commissioner of higher education in accordance
with 20-4-601;
(iv) reports on out-of-district attendance from the superintendent of public instruction in accordance
with 20-5-324;
(v) reports from the education and workforce data governing board in accordance with 20-7-138;
(vi) state-level strengthening career and technical student organizations program reports from the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with 20-7-320;
(vii) a report from the superintendent of public instruction concerning educational programs for
eligible children receiving in-state inpatient treatment of serious emotional disturbances in accordance with 20-
7-435;
(viii) reports from the Montana digital academy governing board in accordance with 20-7-1201;
(ix) advanced opportunity program reports from the board of public education in accordance with
20-7-1506;
(x) progress on transformational learning plans from the board of public education in accordance
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
with 20-7-1602;
(xi) reports on early literacy targeted interventions from the superintendent of public instruction in
accordance with 20-7-1804;
(xii) budget amendments, if needed, from school districts in accordance with 20-9-161;
(xiii) reports regarding the Montana Indian language preservation program from the office of public
instruction in accordance with 20-9-537;
(xiv) annual Montana resident student financial aid program reports from the commissioner of higher
education in accordance with 20-26-105;
(xv) Montana foster youth higher education assistance program grant reports from the
commissioner of higher education in accordance with 20-26-633;
(xvi) a historic preservation office report from the historic preservation officer in accordance with 22-
3-423; and
(xvii) interdisciplinary child information agreement reports from the office of public instruction in
accordance with 52-2-211;
(f) reports to the energy and telecommunications interim committee, including:
(i) the high-performance building report from the department of administration in accordance with
17-7-214;
(ii) an annual report from the consumer counsel in accordance with 69-1-222;
(iii) annual universal system benefits reports from utilities, electric cooperatives, and the
department of revenue in accordance with 69-8-402;
(iv) small-scale hydroelectric power generation reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-501; and
(v) geothermal reports from the Montana bureau of mines and geology in accordance with 90-3-
1301;
(g) reports to the revenue interim committee, including:
(i) use of the qualified endowment tax credit report from the department of revenue in accordance
with 15-1-230;
(ii) tax rates for the upcoming reappraisal cycle from the department of revenue in accordance with
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
15-7-111;
(iii) information about job growth incentive tax credits from the department of revenue in
accordance with 15-30-2361;
(iv) student scholarship contributions from the department of revenue in accordance with 15-30-
3112;
(v) media production tax credit economic impact reports from the department of commerce in
accordance with 15-31-1011; and
(vi) reports that actual or projected receipts will result in less revenue than estimated from the office
of budget and program planning, if necessary, in accordance with 17-7-140;
(h) reports to the transportation interim committee, including:
(i) biodiesel tax refunds from the department of transportation in accordance with 15-70-433;
(ii) cooperative agreement negotiations from the department of transportation in accordance with
15-70-450; and
(iii) a special fuels inspection report from the department of transportation in accordance with 61-
10-154;
(i) reports to the environmental quality council, including:
(i) compliance and enforcement reports required in accordance with 75-1-314;
(ii) the state solid waste management and resource recovery plan, every 5 years, from the
department of environmental quality in accordance with 75-10-111;
(iii) annual orphan share reports from the department of environmental quality in accordance with
75-10-743;
(iv) Libby asbestos superfund oversight committee reports in accordance with 75-10-1601;
(v) annual subdivision sanitation reports from the department of environmental quality in
accordance with 76-4-116;
(vi) quarterly reports from the department of environmental quality on the number and percentage
of overdue files in accordance with 76-4-116;
(vii) state trust land accessibility reports from the department of natural resources and conservation
in accordance with 77-1-820;
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(viii) biennial land banking reports and annual state land cabin and home site sales reports from the
department of natural resources and conservation in accordance with 77-2-366;
(ix) biennially invasive species reports from the departments of fish, wildlife, and parks and natural
resources and conservation in accordance with 80-7-1006;
(x) annual invasive species council reports in accordance with 80-7-1203;
(xi) sand and gravel reports, if an investigation is completed, in accordance with 82-2-701;
(xii) reports from the western Montana conservation commission in accordance with 85-1-904;
(xiii) annual sage grouse population reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-201;
(xiv) annual gray wolf management reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-1-901;
(xv) biennial Tendoy Mountain sheep herd reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-2-702;
(xvi) wildlife habitat improvement project reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in
accordance with 87-5-807; and
(xvii) annual sage grouse oversight team activities and staffing reports in accordance with 87-5-918;
(j) reports to the water policy interim committee, including:
(i) drought and water supply advisory committee reports in accordance with 2-15-3308;
(ii) total maximum daily load reports from the department of environmental quality in accordance
with 75-5-703;
(iii) state water plans from the department of natural resources and conservation in accordance
with 85-1-203;
(iv) small-scale hydroelectric power generation reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-501;
(v) renewable resource grant and loan program reports from the department of natural resources
and conservation in accordance with 85-1-621;
(vi) reports from the western Montana conservation commission in accordance with 85-1-904;
(vii) quarterly adjudication reports from the department of natural resources and conservation and
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
the water court in accordance with 85-2-281;
(viii) water reservation reports from the department of natural resources and conservation in
accordance with 85-2-316;
(ix) instream flow reports from the department of fish, wildlife, and parks in accordance with 85-2-
436; and
(x) ground water investigation program reports from the bureau of mines and geology in
accordance with 85-2-525;
(k) reports to the local government interim committee, including:
(i) reports from the local government center on petitions received that resulted in the development
and delivery of training in accordance with 7-1-206;
(ii) sand and gravel, if an investigation is completed, in accordance with 82-2-701;
(iii) assistance to local governments on federal land management proposals from the department
of commerce in accordance with 90-1-182; and
(iv) emergency financial assistance to local government reports from the department of commerce,
if requests are made, in accordance with 90-6-703(2);
(l) reports to the state-tribal relations committee, including:
(i) reports from the missing indigenous persons review commission in accordance with 2-15-2018;
(ii) the Montana Indian language preservation program report from the office of public instruction in
accordance with 20-9-537;
(iii) reports from the missing indigenous persons task force in accordance with 44-2-411;
(iv) a report from the department of justice on missing persons response team training grants
awarded in accordance with 44-2-416;
(v) state-tribal economic development commission activities reports from the state-tribal economic
development commission in accordance with 90-1-132; and
(vi) state-tribal economic development commission reports provided regularly by the state director
of Indian affairs in accordance with 90-11-102.
(4) Reports to the legislature include multistate compact and agreement reports, including:
(a) multistate tax compact reports in accordance with 15-1-601;
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(b) interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children reports in accordance with
20-1-230 and 20-1-231;
(c) compact for education reports in accordance with 20-2-501;
(d) Western regional higher education compact reports in accordance with 20-25-801;
(e) interstate insurance product regulation compact reports in accordance with 33-39-101;
(f) interstate medical licensure compact reports in accordance with 37-3-356;
(g) interstate compact on juveniles reports in accordance with 41-6-101;
(h) interstate compact for adult offender supervision reports in accordance with 46-23-1115;
(i) vehicle equipment safety compact reports in accordance with 61-2-201;
(j) multistate highway transportation agreement reports in accordance with 61-10-1101; and
(k) western interstate nuclear compact reports in accordance with 90-5-201.
(5) Reports, transfers, statements, assessments, recommendations and changes required under
17-7-138, 17-7-139, 17-7-140, 19-2-405, 19-2-407, 19-3-117, 19-20-201, 19-20-216, 23-7-202, 33-1-115, and
39-71-2375 must be provided as soon as the report is published and publicly available. Reports required in
subsections (2)(a), (2)(gg), (2)(ii), and (3)(b)(xi) must be provided following issuance of reports issued under
Title 5, chapter 13."
Section 2. Section 20-3-326, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-3-326. Information on educational opportunities -- duties of trustees. (1) The board of
trustees of a school district shall develop, update, and annually provide to students and families of the district
information on the educational opportunities available through the schools of the district. The information must
align to the legislative intent of preserving and protecting the right to access personalized learning as set forth
in 20-7-1601 and must be designed to empower families in understanding the options available to them in
partnering with schools to develop their child's full educational potential. A school board may satisfy its
obligation through the use of model resources developed by an organization of school boards of which the
school board is a member.
(2) The information provided under subsection (1) must include, at a minimum, the following
educational and extracurricular opportunities:
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(a) evaluation and identification of children with disabilities and special education programs
beginning at age 3 pursuant to 20-7-411;
(b) early literacy targeted interventions pursuant to 20-7-1801 through 20-7-1804;
(c) part-time enrollment of a student who is otherwise enrolled at a nonpublic or home school
pursuant to 20-5-101;
(d) admission to a school of a district beginning at age 5 pursuant to 20-5-101, and the option to
enroll a child in a half-time kindergarten program pursuant to 20-7-117;
(e) proficiency-based learning and other forms of personalized learning pursuant to 20-7-1601,
including options for obtaining course equivalency and course waiver determinations from the board of trustees
pursuant to 20-3-324(18);
(f) participation in extracurricular activities, including participation by nonpublic and home school
students pursuant to 20-5-112;
(g) access to remote instruction, including through the Montana digital academy pursuant to Title
20, chapter 7, part 12, and through other school districts as provided in 20-7-118;
(h) out-of-district attendance pursuant to Title 20, chapter 5, part 3;
(i) availability of funding to support student access to advanced opportunities, if applicable to a
district pursuant to 20-7-1506;
(j) career and technical education pursuant to Title 20, chapter 7, part 3, including the attainment
of industry-recognized credentials and work-based learning, pursuant to 20-7-1510;
(k) early college, dual enrollment, and running start opportunities, pursuant to 20-9-706; and
(l) other opportunities for school-age children through Montana public schools that:
(i) support the development of a child's full educational potential;
(ii) assist in reducing the costs of postsecondary education and workforce preparation; and
(iii) foster life success.
(3) The legislature intends that boards of trustees and organizations of boards of trustees
communicate and collaborate with the education interim committee to demonstrate the implementation of the
requirements of this section and to identify additional opportunities following legislative sessions."
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
Section 3. Section 20-5-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-101. Admittance of child to school. (1) The trustees shall assign and admit a child to a school
in the district when the child is:
(a) 5 years of age or older on or before September 10 of the year in which the child is to enroll but
is not yet 19 years of age;
(b) a resident of the district; and
(c) otherwise qualified under the provisions of this title to be admitted to the school.
(2) The trustees of a district may assign and admit any nonresident child to a school in the district
under the tuition provisions of this title.
(3) (a) The trustees may at their discretion assign and admit a child to a school in the district who
is under 5 years of age or an adult who is 19 years of age or older if there are exceptional circumstances that
merit waiving the age provision of this section. The trustees may also admit an individual who has graduated
from high school but is not yet 19 years of age even though no special circumstances exist for waiver of the age
provision of this section.
(b) As used in this subsection, "exceptional circumstances" means any of the following:
(i) the child is being admitted into a preschool program established by the trustees pursuant to 20-
7-117;
(ii) the child is determined by the trustees to be ready for kindergarten and the child's parents have
requested early entry into the district's regular 1-year kindergarten program;
(iii) the child is being admitted into an early literacy targeted intervention classroom or jumpstart
program pursuant to Title 20, chapter 7, part 18; or
(iv) the adult is 19 years of age or older and in the trustees' determination would benefit from
educational programs offered by a school of the district.
(c) The admittance of an individual under this subsection (3) does not in and of itself impact the
ANB calculations governed by 20-9-311.
(4) The trustees shall assign and admit a child who is homeless, as defined in the Stewart B.
McKinney Homeless Assistance Act, (Public Law 100-77), to a school in the district regardless of residence.
The trustees may not require an out-of-district attendance agreement or tuition for a homeless child.
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(5) The trustees shall assign and admit a child whose parent or guardian is being relocated to
Montana under military orders to a school in the district and allow the child to preliminarily enroll in classes and
apply for programs offered by the district prior to arrival and establishing residency.
(6) Except for the provisions of subsection (4), tuition for a nonresident child must be paid in
accordance with the tuition provisions of this title.
(7) The trustees' assignment of a child meeting the qualifications of subsection (1) to a school in
the district outside of the adopted school boundaries applicable to the child is subject to the district's grievance
policy. Upon completion of procedures set forth in the district's grievance policy, the trustees' decision regarding
the assignment is final.
(8) The trustees shall assign and admit a child who is enrolled in a nonpublic or home school and
who meets the requirements of subsection (1) as a part-time enrollee at the request of the child's parent or
guardian.
(9) For the purposes of this part, "part-time enrollee" means a qualifying pupil who is enrolled and
admitted at one of the fractional levels that qualify for part-time ANB pursuant to 20-9-311(4)(a) or (4)(d)."
Section 4. Section 20-7-1801, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1801. Findings -- purpose -- legislative intent. (1) The legislature finds that the ability to read
and to perform math at or above grade level is essential for educational success. The legislature also finds that
too many Montana children are not reading proficient in reading or math at the end of 3rd grade.
(2) The purposes of this bill part are to:
(a) provide parents with voluntary early literacy interventions for their children;
(b) increase the number of children who are reading proficient in reading and math at the end of
3rd grade and in so doing help those children develop their full educational potential pursuant to Article X,
section 1(1), of the Montana constitution; and
(c) foster a strong economic return for the state on early literacy educational investment through
enhancing Montana's skilled workforce and decreasing future reliance on social programs and the criminal
justice system.
(3) The legislature intends that the board of public education, the office of public instruction, and
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
the boards of trustees of school districts collaborate to implement this part and achieve the purposes under
subsection (2).
(4) The legislature further intends that the board of public education, the office of public instruction,
and the boards of trustees of school districts collaborate on an ongoing basis to gather, analyze, and make
available outcome data and continually refine the interventions to increase the efficacy and efficiency of each
intervention."
Section 5. Section 20-7-1802, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1802. Definitions. As used in this part, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Early literacy targeted intervention" or "intervention" means, as further described in 20-7-1803,
any of the following:
(a) a classroom-based program;
(b) a home-based program; or
(c) a jumpstart program.
(2) "Eligible child" means a child who is determined through the evaluation methodology selected
by the board of public education pursuant to 20-7-1803 to be below a trajectory leading to reading or math
proficiency at the end of 3rd grade.
(3) "Evaluation methodology" means a research-based methodology, instrument, or assessment
selected by the board of public education to determine, based on a child's age or grade level, whether the child
is above, at, or below a developmental trajectory leading to reading or math proficiency on completion of 3rd
grade.
(4) "Trustees" means the board of trustees of an elementary or K-12 school district."
Section 6. Section 20-7-1803, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1803. Early literacy targeted interventions. (1) The trustees of a school district may provide
eligible children with any of the interventions described in this section. This part may not be construed to limit
the duty or authority of trustees to provide educational opportunities described elsewhere in this title.
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(2) The board of public education shall determine an evaluation methodology evaluation
methodologies to determine, based on a child's age or grade level, whether the child is above, at, or below a
developmental trajectory leading to reading or math proficiency on completion of 3rd grade. The evaluation
methodologies must be:
(a) developmentally appropriate;
(b) research-based;
(c) cost-effective; and
(d) if possible, aligned with formative assessments that inform instruction in the classroom-based
program and the jumpstart program.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide school districts with access to and
technical support for the evaluation methodology, instrument, or assessment methodologies determined by the
board of public education.
(4) A child may not be evaluated for the purposes of this part unless requested by the child's
parent or guardian. The trustees may administer the an evaluation methodology in April, May, or June to a child
who will be 4 years of age or older on or before the following September 10 and who has not yet entered 3rd
grade. A child who is evaluated to be below trajectory for 3rd-grade reading or math proficiency for the child's
age or grade level is an eligible child for the subsequent school year.
(5) (a) For an eligible child who is 4 years of age or older on or before September 10 of the year in
which the child is to participate in the program and who is not entering and who has not completed
kindergarten, the trustees may offer a classroom-based program, which may be a half-time or full-time program.
A full-time program must allow a parent or guardian to enroll the child half-time.
(b) The classroom-based program must align with developmentally appropriate early education
learning standards as determined by the board of public education. The standards must include a requirement
for ongoing evaluation of student progress used to tailor instruction to specific student needs.
(6) (a) For an eligible child who is 4 years of age or older on or before September 10 of the year in
which the child is to participate in the program and who has not yet completed 2nd grade, the trustees may
offer a home-based program.
(b) The home-based program must be selected by the board of public education and must:
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(i) be operated by a nonprofit entity;
(ii) be research-based and proven effective at developing early literacy or numeracy skills in
populations at risk of not being reading proficient in reading or math at the end of 3rd grade;
(iii) foster parental engagement; and
(iv) have a cost of no more than $1,000 a year for each child.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide school districts with access to and
technical support for the home-based early literacy program.
(7) (a) For an eligible child who is 5 years of age or older on or before September 10 of the year in
which the child is to participate in the program and who has not yet completed 3rd grade, the trustees may offer
a jumpstart program.
(b) The jumpstart program must:
(i) take place during the time between the end of one school calendar year and the start of the
next school calendar year, as determined by the trustees, preceding a child's entry into kindergarten, 1st grade,
2nd grade, or 3rd grade;
(ii) be at least 4 weeks in duration and provide at least 120 instructional hours;
(iii) be aligned to a framework determined by the board of public education; and
(iv) be designed in a manner to increase the likelihood of a child being evaluated at the end of the
ensuing school year to be at or above a trajectory leading to reading or math proficiency at the end of 3rd
grade."
Section 7. Section 20-7-1804, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-1804. Early literacy targeted interventions -- funding -- reporting. (1) An eligible child
participating in a classroom-based program pursuant to 20-7-1803(5) must be included in enrollment counts for
the purpose of ANB calculations in the manner described in 20-9-311.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall pay for the costs for an eligible child participating
in a home-based program pursuant to 20-7-1803(6) from funds appropriated for this purpose. The cost for each
child may not exceed $1,000 a year. If the annual appropriation for this program is not sufficient to fully fund all
eligible children participating in the home-based program, the superintendent shall limit participation on a first-
- 23 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
come, first-served basis.
(3) An eligible child participating in a jumpstart program pursuant to 20-7-1803(7) must be counted
as quarter-time enrollment for the purpose of ANB calculations pursuant to 20-9-311.
(4) Trustees offering an early literacy targeted intervention shall closely monitor the program and
report annually to the superintendent of public instruction on the efficacy of the program no later than July 15.
The superintendent shall collaborate with trustees in maximizing the efficiency of fulfilling this reporting
requirement. The report must include anonymized information on student progress, including the student's
performance on:
(a) the evaluation methodology that led to eligibility for the program;
(b) any formative assessments administered;
(c) if administered, the evaluation methodology at the end of the school year in which intervention
was provided; and
(d) any statewide reading and math assessments administered in grades 4 through 6.
(5) Pursuant to 20-7-104, the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor early literacy
targeted interventions and gather data to evaluate the efficacy of the interventions while protecting the privacy
rights of students and families. The superintendent shall report, in accordance with 5-11-210, to the education
interim committee and the education interim budget committee no later than September 1 annually. The report
must contain a comparison analysis by intervention type, including no intervention, and must include:
(a) the number of participating and nonparticipating children and districts;
(b) longitudinal data displaying the proficiency level of participating and nonparticipating children at
each grade level following participation in an intervention;
(c) at a time when the data is available, long-term outcome data for participants and
nonparticipants, including but not limited to:
(i) assessment data in 8th grade and high school;
(ii) high school graduation rates; and
(iii) postsecondary participation rates; and
(d) a list of schools offering one or more targeted interventions and a list of the matched
comparable nonparticipating schools that on the most recent 4th grade statewide reading assessment and
- 24 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
math assessments:
(i) had 75% or more of its students score at proficient or above; or
(ii) improved the percentage of students scoring at proficient or above by 10 or more percentage
points."
Section 8. Section 20-9-311, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-9-311. Calculation of average number belonging (ANB) -- 3-year averaging. (1) Average
number belonging (ANB) must be computed for each budget unit as follows:
(a) compute an average enrollment by adding a count of regularly enrolled pupils who were
enrolled as of the first Monday in October of the prior school fiscal year to a count of regularly enrolled pupils on
the first Monday in February of the prior school fiscal year or the next school day if those dates do not fall on a
school day, and divide the sum by two; and
(b) multiply the average enrollment calculated in subsection (1)(a) by the sum of 180 and the
approved pupil-instruction-related days for the current school fiscal year and divide by 180.
(2) For the purpose of calculating ANB under subsection (1), up to 7 approved pupil-instruction-
related days may be included in the calculation.
(3) When a school district has approval to operate less than the minimum aggregate hours under
20-9-806, the total ANB must be calculated in accordance with the provisions of 20-9-805.
(4) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4)(d), for the purpose of calculating ANB, enrollment in
an education program:
(i) from 180 to 359 aggregate hours of pupil instruction per school year is counted as one-quarter-
time enrollment;
(ii) from 360 to 539 aggregate hours of pupil instruction per school year is counted as half-time
enrollment;
(iii) from 540 to 719 aggregate hours of pupil instruction per school year is counted as three-
quarter-time enrollment; and
(iv) 720 or more aggregate hours of pupil instruction per school year is counted as full-time
enrollment.
- 25 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4)(d), enrollment in a program intended to provide fewer than
180 aggregate hours of pupil instruction per school year may not be included for purposes of ANB.
(c) Enrollment in a self-paced program or course may be converted to an hourly equivalent based
on the hours necessary and appropriate to provide the course within a regular classroom schedule.
(d) A school district may include in its calculation of ANB a pupil who is enrolled in a program
providing fewer than the required aggregate hours of pupil instruction required under subsection (4)(a) or (4)(b)
if the pupil has demonstrated proficiency in the content ordinarily covered by the instruction as determined by
the school board using district assessments. The ANB of a pupil under this subsection (4)(d) must be converted
to an hourly equivalent based on the hours of instruction ordinarily provided for the content over which the
student has demonstrated proficiency.
(e) (i) Except as provided in subsection (4)(e)(ii), a pupil in kindergarten through grade 12 who is
concurrently enrolled in more than one public school, program, or district may not be counted as more than one
full-time pupil for ANB purposes. When a pupil is concurrently enrolled in more than one district, any fractional
enrollment under subsection (4)(a) must be attributed first to a pupil's nonresident district.
(ii) A pupil who participates in a jumpstart program under Title 20, chapter 7, part 18, may be
counted as up to 1 1/4 enrollment for ANB purposes. A district shall add one-quarter enrollment for a pupil who
participated in an early literacy a jumpstart program to the pupil's regular enrollment count under this subsection
(4) in both the October and February enrollment counts following the student's participation in the jumpstart
program.
(5) For a district that is transitioning from a half-time to a full-time kindergarten program, the state
superintendent shall count kindergarten enrollment in the previous year as full-time enrollment for the purpose
of calculating ANB for the elementary programs offering full-time kindergarten in the current year. For the
purposes of calculating the 3-year ANB, the superintendent of public instruction shall count the kindergarten
enrollment as one-half enrollment and then add the additional kindergarten ANB to the 3-year average ANB for
districts offering full-time kindergarten.
(6) When a pupil has been absent, with or without excuse, for more than 10 consecutive school
days, the pupil may not be included in the enrollment count used in the calculation of the ANB unless the pupil
resumes attendance prior to the day of the enrollment count.
- 26 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(7) (a) The enrollment of preschool pupils, as provided in 20-7-117, may not be included in the
ANB calculations.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7)(c), a pupil who has reached 19 years of age by
September 10 of the school year may not be included in the ANB calculations.
(c) A pupil with disabilities who is over 19 years of age and has not yet reached 21 years of age by
September 10 of the school year and who is receiving special education services from a school district pursuant
to 20-7-411(4)(a) may be included in the ANB calculations if:
(i) the student has not graduated;
(ii) the student is eligible for special education services and is likely to be eligible for adult services
for individuals with developmental disabilities due to the significance of the student's disability; and
(iii) the student's individualized education program has identified transition goals that focus on
preparation for living and working in the community following high school graduation since age 16 or the
student's disability has increased in significance after age 16.
(d) A school district providing special education services pursuant to subsection (7)(c) is
encouraged to collaborate with agencies and programs that serve adults with developmental disabilities in
meeting the goals of a student's transition plan.
(8) The average number belonging of the regularly enrolled pupils for the public schools of a
district must be based on the aggregate of all the regularly enrolled pupils attending the schools of the district,
except that:
(a) the ANB is calculated as a separate budget unit when:
(i) a school of the district is located more than 20 miles beyond the incorporated limits of a city or
town located in the district and at least 20 miles from any other school of the district, the number of regularly
enrolled pupils of the school must be calculated as a separate budget unit for ANB purposes and the district
must receive a basic entitlement for the school calculated separately from the other schools of the district;
(ii) a school of the district is located more than 20 miles from any other school of the district and
incorporated territory is not involved in the district, the number of regularly enrolled pupils of the school must be
calculated separately for ANB purposes and the district must receive a basic entitlement for the school
calculated separately from the other schools of the district;
- 27 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(iii) the superintendent of public instruction approves an application not to aggregate when
geographic barriers exist affecting transportation, such as poor roads, mountains, rivers, or other obstacles to
travel, that would result in an unusual hardship to the pupils of the school if they were transported to another
school, the number of regularly enrolled pupils of the school must be calculated separately for ANB purposes
and the district must receive a basic entitlement for the school calculated separately from the other schools of
the district; or
(iv) two or more districts consolidate or annex under the provisions of 20-6-422 or 20-6-423, the
ANB and the basic entitlements of the component districts must be calculated separately for a period of 3 years
following the consolidation or annexation. Each district shall retain a percentage of its basic entitlement for 3
additional years as follows:
(A) 75% of the basic entitlement for the fourth year;
(B) 50% of the basic entitlement for the fifth year; and
(C) 25% of the basic entitlement for the sixth year.
(b) when a junior high school has been approved and accredited as a junior high school, all of the
regularly enrolled pupils of the junior high school must be considered as high school district pupils for ANB
purposes;
(c) when a middle school has been approved and accredited, all pupils below the 7th grade must
be considered elementary school pupils for ANB purposes and the 7th and 8th grade pupils must be considered
high school pupils for ANB purposes; or
(d) when a school has been designated as nonaccredited by the board of public education
because of failure to meet the board of public education's assurance and performance standards, the regularly
enrolled pupils attending the nonaccredited school are not eligible for average number belonging calculation
purposes, nor will an average number belonging for the nonaccredited school be used in determining the BASE
funding program for the district.
(9) The district shall provide the superintendent of public instruction with semiannual reports of
school attendance, absence, and enrollment for regularly enrolled students, using a format determined by the
superintendent.
(10) (a) Except as provided in subsections (10)(b) and (10)(c), enrollment in a basic education
- 28 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
program provided by the district through any combination of in-person or remote instruction may be included for
ANB purposes only if the pupil is offered access to the complete range of educational services for the basic
education program required by the accreditation standards adopted by the board of public education.
(b) Access to school programs and services for a student placed by the trustees in a private
program for special education may be limited to the programs and services specified in an approved individual
education plan supervised by the district.
(c) Access to school programs and services for a student who is incarcerated in a facility, other
than a youth detention center, may be limited to the programs and services provided by the district at district
expense under an agreement with the incarcerating facility.
(d) This subsection (10) may not be construed to require a school district to offer access to
activities governed by an organization having jurisdiction over interscholastic activities, contests, and
tournaments to a pupil who is not otherwise eligible under the rules of the organization.
(11) A district may include only, for ANB purposes, an enrolled pupil who is otherwise eligible under
this title and who is:
(a) a resident of the district or a nonresident student admitted by trustees under a student
attendance agreement and who is attending a school or an offsite instructional setting of the district;
(b) unable to attend school due to a medical reason certified by a medical doctor and receiving
individualized educational services supervised by the district, at district expense, at a home or facility that does
not offer an educational program;
(c) unable to attend school due to the student's incarceration in a facility, other than a youth
detention center, and who is receiving individualized educational services supervised by the district, at district
expense, at a home or facility that does not offer an educational program;
(d) receiving special education and related services, other than day treatment, under a placement
by the trustees at a private nonsectarian school or private program if the pupil's services are provided at the
district's expense under an approved individual education plan supervised by the district;
(e) participating in the running start program at district expense under 20-9-706;
(f) receiving educational services, provided by the district, using appropriately licensed district staff
at a private residential program or private residential facility licensed by the department of public health and
- 29 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
human services;
(g) enrolled in an educational program or course provided at district expense using remote delivery
methods, including but not limited to tutoring, distance learning programs, online programs, and technology
delivered learning programs. The pupil:
(i) must meet the residency requirements for that district as provided in 1-1-215;
(ii) shall live in the district and must be eligible for educational services under the Individuals With
Disabilities Education Act or under 29 U.S.C. 794; or
(iii) must be enrolled in the educational program or course under a mandatory attendance
agreement as provided in 20-5-321; or
(iv) must be receiving remote instruction under 20-7-118(1)(c).
(h) a resident of the district attending the Montana youth challenge program or a Montana job
corps program under an interlocal agreement with the district under 20-9-707.
(12) A district shall, for ANB purposes, calculate the enrollment of an eligible Montana youth
challenge program participant as half-time enrollment.
(13) (a) A district may, for ANB purposes, include in the October and February enrollment counts an
individual who is otherwise eligible under this title and who during the prior school year:
(i) resided in the district;
(ii) was not enrolled in the district or was not enrolled full time; and
(iii) completed an extracurricular activity with a duration of at least 6 weeks.
(b) (i) Except as provided in subsection (13)(b)(ii), each completed extracurricular activity under
subsection (13)(a) may be counted as one-sixteenth enrollment for the individual, but under this subsection (13)
the individual may not be counted as more than one full-time enrollment for ANB purposes.
(ii) Each completed extracurricular activity lasting longer than 18 weeks may be counted as one-
eighth enrollment.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "extracurricular activity" means:
(i) a sport or activity sanctioned by an organization having jurisdiction over interscholastic
activities, contests, and tournaments;
(ii) an approved career and technical student organization, pursuant to 20-7-306; or
- 30 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 338
(iii) a school theater production.
(14) (a) For an elementary or high school district that has been in existence for 3 years or more, the
district's maximum general fund budget and BASE budget for the ensuing school fiscal year must be calculated
using the current year ANB for all budget units or the 3-year average ANB for all budget units, whichever
generates the greatest maximum general fund budget.
(b) For a K-12 district that has been in existence for 3 years or more, the district's maximum
general fund budget and BASE budget for the ensuing school fiscal year must be calculated separately for the
elementary and high school programs pursuant to subsection (14)(a) and then combined.
(15) The term "3-year ANB" means an average ANB over the most recent 3-year period, calculated
by:
(a) adding the ANB for the budget unit for the ensuing school fiscal year to the ANB for each of the
previous 2 school fiscal years; and
(b) dividing the sum calculated under subsection (15)(a) by three."
Section 9. Transition. A school district may administer a numeracy-based evaluation methodology
as soon as the methodology is determined by the board of public education pursuant to 20-7-1803, and a
district may incorporate numeracy in jumpstart programs starting on or after [the effective date of this act].
Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 31 - Authorized Print Version – HB 338
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 338, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 338
INTRODUCED BY M. ROMANO, J. REAVIS, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, M. LEE, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, P.
STRAND, T. CROWE, P. ELVERUM, S. FYANT, J. WEBER, J. SOOKTIS, A. GRIFFITH, D. POWERS, M.
CUNNINGHAM, S. ROSENZWEIG, E. TILLEMAN, E. BUTTREY, G. HUNTER, L. JONES, E. MATTHEWS, F.
SMITH, C. SPRUNGER, M. FOX, D. BAUM, M. CAFERRO, B. CARTER, J. COHENOUR, T. FRANCE, S.
HOWELL, J. KARLEN, C. KEOGH, K. KORTUM, L. REKSTEN, E. STAFMAN, K. SULLIVAN, M. THANE, P.
TUSS, S. DEMAROIS, J. DARLING, D. JOY, C. FITZPATRICK, J. LYNCH
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO EARLY LITERACY TARGETED INTERVENTIONS TO INCLUDE
NUMERACY AND ALLOW GREATER FLEXIBILITY IN EVALUATING CHILDREN FOR ELIGIBILITY; REVISING
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AMENDING SECTIONS 5-11-222, 20-3-326, 20-5-101, 20-7-1801, 20-7-1802,
20-7-1803, 20-7-1804, AND 20-9-311, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”